District of Columbia statutes.
37-205.01

Supervision of municipal fish market.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized and directed in the name of the District of Columbia to exclusively control, regulate, and operate as a market and for such other uses as the Mayor determines to be appropriate, the water frontage on the Potomac River lying south of Water Street, between 11th and 12th Streets, including the buildings and wharves thereon; and said Mayor shall have power to make leases, fix and determine rentals, wharfage and dockage fees, and to collect and pay the same into the treasury of the United States to the credit of the General Fund of the District of Columbia; and said Mayor to make and amend, from time to time, all such regulations as it may deem proper for the control, regulation, and operation of said market.

History

Mar. 19, 1906, 34 Stat. 72, ch. 958
Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 941, ch. 150
Feb. 22, 1921, 41 Stat. 1144, ch. 70, § 7
June 28, 1944, 58 Stat. 533, ch. 300, § 18
May 2, 2002, D.C. Law 14-116, § 5, 49 DCR 1945
July 9, 2012, 126 Stat. 990, Pub. L. 112-143, § 2

Cross References

Control and rental of wharves, see §§ 10-501.01, 10-501.02.
Harbor regulations, see § 22-4401 et seq.
Rules and regulations, see § 1-303.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 10-137.
1973 Ed., § 10-135.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-116 substituted “said Mayor” for “the Council of the District of Columbia”.
Pub. L. 112-143 substituted “operate as a market and for such other uses as the Mayor determines to be appropriate” for “operate as a municipal fish wharf and market”; deleted “, and said wharf shall constitute the sole wharf for the landing of fish and oysters for sale in the District of Columbia” following “thereon”; and substituted “operation of said market” for “operation of said municipal fish wharf and market”.

Temporary Amendment of Section

Section 5 of D.C. Law 14-55 amended the section by substituting “said Mayor” for “the Council of the District of Columbia”.
Section 10(b) of D.C. Law 14-55 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5 of Food Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-128, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7939).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5 of Food Regulation Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-147, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 10183).

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority to National Capital Revitalization Corporation and Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Reorganization Clarification Emergency Act of 2007, see Mayor’s Order 2007-172, July 25, 2007 ( 54 DCR 11600).

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(200) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Home Rule Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.